Hawaii statutes.
[PART X.]
ASSISTING AGRICULTURAL ENTERPRISES SERVING

IMPORTANT
AGRICULTURAL LANDS

[Part
heading effective until ratification of constitutional amendments.]

PART X.
ASSISTING AGRICULTURAL ENTERPRISES

[Part
heading effective after ratification of constitutional amendments.]

Note

Part heading amended by L 2014, c 103, §1.

§39A‑311 Definitions. Whenever
used in this part, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context:

"Department" means the department of
budget and finance.

"Project" means any combination of
land, buildings, and other improvements thereon, including without limitation
irrigation systems and infrastructure, for use of, or for, or to assist an
agricultural enterprise, including without limiting the generality of the foregoing,
machinery, equipment, furnishings, and apparatus that are deemed necessary,
suitable, or useful to the enterprise.

"Project agreement" means any
agreement entered into under this part by the department with a project party
to finance, construct, operate, or maintain a project from the proceeds of
special purpose revenue bonds, or to lend the proceeds of special purpose
revenue bonds to assist an agricultural enterprise, including without
limitation any loan agreement.

"Project party" means a person, firm,
or corporation qualified to do business in this State and conducting or
proposing to conduct an agricultural enterprise.

"Special purpose revenue bonds" or
"bonds" means bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness of the
State issued pursuant to this part. [L 2006, c 148, pt of §1; am L 2014, c 103,
§2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next